District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-1802

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-99, § 3, 27 DCR 3599
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-156, § 2(a)-(d), 29 DCR 3612
Feb. 24, 1984, D.C. Law 5-48, § 12(a), 30 DCR 5778
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-159, § 12, 32 DCR 30
Sept. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-26, § 3, 32 DCR 3615
Mar. 16, 1993, D.C. Law 9-197, § 22, 39 DCR 9195

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-302.

Editor's Notes

Severability: Section 21 of D.C. Law 9-197 provided that if any provision of the act is held invalid for any reason, the invalidity shall not effect the other provisions which shall be given effect without the invalid provisions.